Montana, session 2025, HB577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 44-1-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"44-1-201. Appointment and tenure. The attorney general shall select a highway patrol chief who
must have the rank of colonel and shall hold office until the appointment has terminated for cause, as set forth
in parts 7 through 9 of this chapter serve at the pleasure of the attorney general."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Applicability. [This act] applies to an appointment as highway patrol
chief made on or after [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 577